Wyoming, session 2026, HB0066.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-3-114(b), (c)(intro) and by
creating new subsections (d) and (e) and 30-2-213(b) are
amended to read:

16-3-114. Judicial review of agency actions; district
courts.

HB0066

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0285
(b) The supreme court's authority to adopt rules
governing review from agencies to the district courts shall
include authority to determine the content of the record
upon review, the pleadings to be filed, the time and manner
for filing the pleadings, records and other documents and
the extent to which supplemental testimony and evidence may
be taken or considered by the district court. The rules
adopted by the supreme court under this provision may
supersede existing statutory provisions.

(c) To the extent necessary to make a decision and
when presented, the reviewing court shall decide all
relevant questions of law, interpret constitutional and
statutory provisions, and determine the meaning or
applicability of the terms of an agency action. In making
the following determinations, the court shall review the
whole record or those parts of it cited by a party. and due
account shall be taken of the rule of prejudicial error.
The reviewing court shall:

(d) In interpreting a state statute, rule, regulation
or other sub-regulatory document, the reviewing court shall
not defer to a state agency's interpretation of the
HB0066

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0285
statute, rule, regulation or final decision and shall
instead interpret the meaning of the statute, rule,
regulation or final decision and effect de novo.

(e) In actions brought under this section by or
against state agencies, after applying all customary tools
of interpretation, the reviewing court shall exercise any
remaining doubt in favor of a reasonable interpretation
that limits agency power and maximizes individual liberty.

30-2-213. Judicial review of decision of inspector;
procedure; payment of costs assessed against inspector;
appeal.

(b) Judicial review shall be in accordance with W.S.
16-3-114(c) through (e). An interested party may obtain
review of any final judgment of the district court under
this section by appeal to the supreme court. The appeal
shall be taken as in other civil cases.

Section 2. This act shall apply to actions for
judicial review filed on and after the effective date of
this act.
HB0066

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0285

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0066